District of Columbia statutes.
3-604

Establishment of Commission.

(a)

There is hereby created a District of Columbia Boxing and Wrestling Commission to consist of 3 members nominated by the Mayor and approved by the Council.

(b)

Other than as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the term of office of a member of the Commission shall be 3 years.

(c)

Whenever a vacancy on the Commission occurs before the end of a term, the Mayor, with the consent of the Council, may appoint a person to complete the remaining period of that term.

(d)

A Commission member may be removed by resolution of the Council:

(1)

For good cause shown; or

(2)

Upon the written recommendation of the Mayor.

(e)

The members of the Commission shall be residents of the District of Columbia for the duration of their term.

(f)

The members of the Commission shall receive compensation pursuant to the provisions of § 1-611.08.

(g)

The Mayor shall, within 30 days of October 8, 1975, nominate an individual to serve as Chairperson of the Commission for 3 years, and 2 more individuals to serve as members for 2 years, and 1 year respectively. The Council shall confirm or reject these nominees within 90 days of their nomination, or, in the absence of such action, within 90 days, such nominees shall be deemed confirmed. When at least 2 members have been confirmed, the Commission shall be deemed established.

History

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 5, 23 DCR 1808
June 9, 1976, D.C. Law 1-66, § 2, 23 DCR 498
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(mm), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2 (gg), 27 DCR 2632

Cross References

Disclosure of financial interests, requirements, see § 1-1106.02.
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Nomination and approval of agency heads, see § 1-523.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01 and § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-604.
1973 Ed., § 2-1234.